California statutes. Vehicle Code
(d) Any person convicted for a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished upon conviction by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 505, Sec. 14.   (SB 485)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

23225.

(a) (1) It is unlawful for the registered owner of any motor vehicle to keep in a motor vehicle, when the vehicle is upon any highway or on lands, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 23220, any bottle, can, or other receptacle containing any alcoholic beverage that has been opened, or a seal broken, or the contents of which have been partially removed, unless the container is kept in the trunk of the vehicle.

(2) If the vehicle is not equipped with a trunk and is not an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification, as defined in Section 38012, the bottle, can, or other receptacle described in paragraph (1) shall be kept in some other area of the vehicle that is not normally occupied by the
 driver or passengers. For the purposes of this paragraph, a utility compartment or glove compartment shall be deemed to be within the area occupied by the driver and passengers.

(3) If the vehicle is not equipped with a trunk and is an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 38012, the bottle, can, or other receptacle described in paragraph (1) shall be kept in a locked container. As used in this paragraph, “locked container” means a secure container that is fully enclosed and locked by a padlock, key lock, combination lock, or similar locking device.

(b) Subdivision (a) is also applicable to a driver of a motor vehicle if the registered owner is not present in the vehicle.

(c) This section shall not apply to the living quarters of a housecar or
 camper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 276.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

23226.

(a) It is unlawful for any driver to keep in the passenger compartment of a motor vehicle, when the vehicle is upon any highway or on lands, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 23220, any bottle, can, or other receptacle containing any alcoholic beverage that has been opened, or a seal broken, or the contents of which have been partially removed.

(b) It is unlawful for any passenger to keep in the passenger compartment of a motor vehicle, when the vehicle is upon any highway or on lands, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 23220, any bottle, can, or other receptacle containing any alcoholic beverage that has been opened or a seal broken, or the contents of which have been partially removed.

(c) This section does not apply to the living quarters of a housecar or camper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 277.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

23229.

(a) Except as provided in Section 23229.1, Section 23221, as it applies to an alcoholic beverage, and Section 23223 do not apply to passengers in any bus, taxicab, or limousine for hire licensed to transport passengers pursuant to the Public Utilities Code or proper local authority, the living quarters of a housecar or camper, or of a pedicab operated pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 21215) of Chapter 1.

(b) Except as provided in Section
 23229.1, Section 23225 does not apply to the driver or owner of a bus, taxicab, or limousine for hire licensed to transport passengers pursuant to the Public Utilities Code or proper local authority, or of a pedicab operated pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 21215) of Chapter 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 636, Sec. 8.   (AB 1810)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

23229.1.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), Sections 23223 and 23225 apply to any driver providing transportation services on a prearranged basis as a charter-party carrier of passengers, as defined in Section 5360 of the Public Utilities Code, when the driver of the vehicle transports any passenger under 21 years of age and fails to comply with the requirements of Section 5384.1 of the Public Utilities Code.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), it is not a violation of Section 23225 for any driver providing transportation services on a prearranged basis as a charter-party carrier of passengers that is licensed pursuant to the Public Utilities Code to keep
 any bottle, can, or other receptacle containing any alcoholic beverage in a locked utility compartment within the area occupied by the driver and passengers.

(c) In addition to the requirements of Section 1803, every clerk of a court in which any driver in subdivision (a) was convicted of a violation of Section 23225 shall prepare within 10 days after
 conviction, and immediately forward to the Public Utilities Commission at its office in San Francisco, an abstract of the record of the court covering the case in which the person was convicted. If sentencing is not pronounced in conjunction with the conviction, the abstract shall be forwarded to the commission within 10 days after sentencing, and the abstract shall be certified, by the person required to prepare it, to be true and correct. For the purposes of this subdivision, a forfeiture of bail is equivalent to a conviction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 461, Sec. 6.   (AB 45)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Ignition Interlock Device [23247. - 23247.]

23247.

(a) It is unlawful for a person to knowingly rent, lease, or lend a motor vehicle to another person known to have had their driving privilege restricted as provided in Section 13352, 13352.1, 13353.6, 13353.75, 23575, 23575.3, or 23700, unless the vehicle is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device. A person, whose driving privilege is restricted pursuant to Section 13352, 13352.1, 13353.6, 13353.75, 23575, 23575.3, or 23700,
 shall notify any other person who rents, leases, or loans a motor vehicle to them of the driving restriction imposed under that section.

(b) It is unlawful for any person whose driving privilege is restricted pursuant to Section 13352, 13352.1, 13353.6, 13353.75, 23575, 23575.3, or 23700 to request or solicit any other person to blow into an ignition interlock device or to start a motor vehicle equipped with the device for the purpose of providing the person so restricted with an operable motor vehicle.

(c) It is unlawful to blow into an ignition interlock device or to start a motor vehicle equipped with the device for the purpose of providing an operable motor
 vehicle to a person whose driving privilege is restricted pursuant to Section 13352, 13352.1, 13353.6, 13353.75, 23575, 23575.3, or 23700.

(d) It is unlawful to remove, bypass, or tamper with, an ignition interlock device.

(e) It is unlawful for any person whose driving privilege is restricted pursuant to Section 13352, 13352.1, 13353.6, 13353.75, 23575, 23575.3, or 23700 to operate any vehicle not equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device.

(f) Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six months or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(g) (1) If any person whose driving privilege
 is restricted pursuant to Section 13352, 13352.1, 13353.6, or 13353.75 is convicted of a violation of subdivision (e), the court shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles, which shall immediately terminate the restriction and shall suspend or revoke the person’s driving privilege for the remaining period of the originating suspension or revocation and until all reinstatement requirements in Section 13352 or 13353.3 are met.

(2) If any person who is restricted pursuant to Section 23575.3, subdivision (a) or (i) of Section 23575, or Section 23700 is convicted of a violation of subdivision (e), the department shall suspend the person’s driving privilege for one year from the date of the conviction.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, if a vehicle in which a functioning, certified ignition interlock device has been installed is impounded, the manufacturer or installer of the device
 shall have the right to remove the device from the vehicle during normal business hours. No charge shall be imposed for the removal of the device nor shall the manufacturer or installer be liable for any removal, towing, impoundment, storage, release, or administrative costs or penalties associated with the impoundment. Upon request, the person seeking to remove the device shall present documentation to justify removal of the device from the vehicle. Any damage to the vehicle resulting from the removal of the device is the responsibility of the person removing it.

(i) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(j) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1,
 2033, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2033, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 485, Sec. 21) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 20.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 21 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

23247.

(a) It is unlawful for a person to knowingly rent, lease, or lend a motor vehicle to another person known to have had their driving privilege restricted as provided in Section 13352, 23575, or 23700, unless the vehicle is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device. A person, whose driving privilege is restricted pursuant to Section 13352, 23575, or 23700, shall notify any other person who rents, leases, or loans a
 motor vehicle to
 them of the driving restriction imposed under that section.

(b) It is unlawful for any person whose driving privilege is restricted pursuant to Section 13352, 23575, or 23700 to request or solicit any other person to blow into an ignition interlock device or to start a motor vehicle equipped with the device for the purpose of providing the person so restricted with an operable motor vehicle.

(c) It is unlawful to blow into an ignition interlock device or to start a motor vehicle equipped with the device for the purpose of providing an operable motor vehicle to a person whose driving privilege is restricted pursuant to Section 13352, 23575, or 23700.

(d) It is unlawful to remove, bypass, or tamper with, an ignition interlock device.

(e) It is unlawful for any person whose driving privilege is restricted pursuant to Section 13352, 23575, or 23700 to operate any vehicle not equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device.

(f) Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six months or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(g) (1) If any person whose driving privilege is restricted pursuant to Section 13352 is convicted of a violation of subdivision (e), the court shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles, which shall immediately terminate the restriction and shall suspend or revoke the person’s driving privilege for the remaining period of the originating suspension or
 revocation and until all reinstatement requirements in Section 13352 are met.

(2) If any person who is restricted pursuant to subdivision (a) or (l) of Section 23575 or Section 23700 is convicted of a violation of subdivision (e), the department shall suspend the person’s driving privilege for one year from the date of the conviction.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, if a vehicle in which a functioning, certified ignition interlock device has been installed is impounded, the manufacturer or installer of the device shall have the right to remove the device from the vehicle during normal business hours. No charge shall be imposed for the removal of the device nor shall the manufacturer or installer be liable for any removal, towing, impoundment, storage, release, or administrative costs or penalties associated with the impoundment. Upon request, the person seeking to remove
 the device shall present documentation to justify removal of the device from the vehicle. Any damage to the vehicle resulting from the removal of the device is the responsibility of the person removing it.

(i) This section shall become operative January 1,
 2033.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 783, Sec. 28) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 21.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section operative January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Alcohol and Drug Problem Assessment Program [23249.50. - 23249.50.]

23249.50.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Driving under the influence of an alcoholic beverage or a drug is a serious problem, constituting the largest group of misdemeanor violations in many counties.

(2) Studies of first offenders have found that more than half of first offenders are alcoholics or problem drinkers. There are higher percentages of problem drinkers among second offenders than among first offenders.

(3) As the link between the health and legal aspects of the problem has become recognized, the courts have sought more information on a presentence basis in determining the appropriate sentence.

(4) Laws relating to driving under the influence of an alcoholic beverage or a drug allow the courts to order a presentence investigation to determine whether a person can benefit from an education, training, or treatment program. The Legislature thus finds that, to adequately assess whether an individual arrested for driving under the influence of an alcoholic beverage or a drug is chemically dependent, it is important to develop and implement screening programs in order to continue to address the problem of driving under the influence of alcoholic beverages or drugs in the state.

(b) It is therefore the intent of the Legislature to establish an additional procedure to assist the courts in the use of presentence investigations of individuals convicted of driving under the influence of an alcoholic beverage or a drug and to enable the courts to make appropriate dispositions in these cases. As part of this process, the courts should obtain and consider a presentence investigation report detailing the defendant’s driving and criminal record, and, where possible, an alcohol or drug problem assessment report. In all cases, an alcohol or drug problem assessment report should be completed by qualified personnel prior to the determination of an education or treatment plan and subsequent sentencing by the courts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 160, Sec. 183.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. Vehicular Crossings and Toll Highways [23250. - 23336.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [23250. - 23255.]

23250.

All of the provisions of this code not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter shall be applicable to vehicular crossings and toll highways. This chapter shall control over any provision of this code inconsistent with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1154, Sec. 72.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

23251.

(a) The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall provide for proper and adequate policing of all toll highways and all vehicular crossings to ensure the enforcement thereon of this code and of any other law relating to the use and operation of vehicles upon toll highways, highways or vehicular crossings, and of the rules and regulations of the Department of Transportation in respect thereto, and to cooperate with the Department of Transportation to the end that vehicular crossings be operated at all times in a manner as to carry traffic efficiently. The authority of the Department of the California Highway Patrol is exclusive except as to the authority conferred by law upon the Department of Transportation in respect to vehicular crossings.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a private operator of a toll highway may make temporary arrangements, not to exceed 30 days, for traffic law enforcement services with an agency that employs peace officers as described in Section 830.1 of the Penal Code, if the Department of the California Highway Patrol cannot fulfill its responsibilities as described in this section, as determined by the Secretary of the Business, Transportation and Housing Agency.

(c) The services provided by the Department of the California Highway Patrol for all toll highways that are operated by a private entity shall be reimbursed pursuant to Section 30809.1 of the Streets and Highways Code. If the private operator of a toll highway and the Department of the California Highway Patrol reach an impasse in negotiating an agreement for reimbursement, the Secretary of the Business, Transportation and Housing Agency shall assist in resolving the impasse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1241, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

23252.

The chief of toll services, captains, lieutenants, and sergeants employed by the Department of Transportation shall have the powers and authority of peace officers as listed in Section 830.4 of the Penal Code while so employed on any vehicular crossing or as may be necessary to the performance of their duties while not upon such vehicular crossing. Captains, lieutenants, and sergeants so employed shall wear, while on duty, a uniform which shall be distinctly different from that of the California Highway Patrol, to be specified by the Director of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

23253.

All persons in, or upon, any toll highway or vehicular crossing shall at all times comply with any lawful order, signal, or direction by voice or hand of any member of the California Highway Patrol or an employee of the Department of Transportation who is a peace officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1241, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

23254.

A “vehicular crossing” is any toll bridge or toll highway crossing and the approaches thereto, constructed or acquired by the Department of Transportation under the provisions of the California Toll Bridge Authority Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

23255.

An “approach” is that portion of a state highway leading to or from a toll bridge or toll highway crossing which lies between one end of the bridge or crossing and the nearest intersection of a highway with the state highway. A ramp or other structure designed exclusively for use in connection with a toll bridge or toll highway crossing shall not be deemed an intersecting highway but is a part of the approach.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Towing on Vehicular Crossings [23270. - 23273.]

23270.

(a) No person shall commence to tow any vehicle or other object on any vehicular crossing unless authorized to do so by the Department of Transportation and unless the towing is done by means of a tow truck as defined in Section 615. No person, other than a member of the California Highway Patrol or an employee of the Department of Transportation, shall, by means of pushing with another vehicle, propel any vehicle or object on a vehicular crossing. No person, other than an employee of the Department of Transportation, shall, on any vehicular crossing, tow any vehicle or other object except a vehicle or object constructed and designed to be towed by a vehicle of a type similar to that being used for this purpose.

(b) The California Transportation Commission shall, by regulation, establish the maximum towing fee which may be charged by any person authorized to tow a vehicle pursuant to subdivision (a). No authorized person shall charge a fee for towing a vehicle which is in excess of the maximum fee established by the California Transportation Commission.

(c) The Director of Transportation may grant a special permit to any person to tow any vehicle or object over and completely across any vehicular crossing when in his or her judgment the towing vehicle is so constructed and equipped that the vehicle or object can be towed across the vehicular crossing without endangering persons or property and without interrupting the orderly traffic across the vehicular crossing.

(d) The prohibitions of this section shall apply only on those vehicular crossings upon which a towing service is maintained by the Department of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 216, Sec. 119.)
-------------------------------------------

23271.

A towing service may be maintained on each vehicular crossing by the Department of Transportation, and the department may furnish such service as is necessary to permit the orderly flow of traffic upon such crossing. The Department of Transportation may prescribe and collect reasonable rates for towing services furnished.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

23272.

When any vehicle or object on any vehicular crossing, upon which towing service is maintained, is stopped for any reason and is obstructing or may obstruct traffic, the vehicle or object shall be towed by the towing service either to the nearest property of the Department of Transportation designated for the parking or storing of vehicles, or to a suitable parking location on a public street or highway and thereupon left in the custody of the owner or operator of the vehicle or object, or his agent, or, if no owner, operator, or agent is present, or if an owner, operator, or agent so requests, to a public garage or off-street parking facility. The department may prescribe the limits within which the towing service shall be operated.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, the department may furnish and deliver fuel to vehicles, the supply of which is exhausted, or change tires, and may charge a reasonable sum for the services and materials furnished or, if the department deems it safe and advisable, and the owner or operator of the vehicle or object so requests, it may be towed from the vehicular crossing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 85.)
-------------------------------------------

23273.

Sections 24605, 25253, 27700, and 27907 do not apply to vehicles operated by the Department of Transportation pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Tolls and Other Charges [23300. - 23309.]

23300.

The Department of Transportation shall erect appropriate signs at each entrance to a vehicular crossing to notify traffic that it is entering upon a vehicular crossing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

23301.

Except as provided in Sections 23301.3 and 23301.5, a vehicle that enters into or upon a vehicular crossing is liable for those tolls and other charges prescribed by the California Transportation Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 871, Sec. 1.   (AB 2949)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23301.3.

(a) A vehicle described in subdivision (b) is exempt from a toll or other charge on a toll road, toll bridge, toll highway, vehicular crossing, or other toll facility.

(b) The exemption described in subdivision (a) applies only to a vehicle that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The vehicle is registered to a veteran.

(2) The vehicle is displaying one of the following license plates:

(A) A license plate issued to a disabled veteran, pursuant to Section 5007.

(B) A license plate
 issued to a Pearl Harbor survivor, pursuant to Section 5101.3.

(C) A license plate issued to a recipient of the Army Medal of Honor, Navy Medal of Honor, Air Force Medal of Honor, Army Distinguished Service Cross, Navy Cross, or Air Force Cross, pursuant to Section 5101.4.

(D) A license plate issued to a former American prisoner of war, pursuant to Section 5101.5.

(E) A license plate issued to a recipient of the Congressional Medal of Honor, pursuant to Section 5101.6.

(F) A license plate issued to a recipient of the Purple Heart, pursuant to Section 5101.8.

(3) The vehicle is registered to a transponder or other electronic toll payment device account with an issuing agency as defined in
 Section 40250.

(c) This section does not exempt a vehicle described in subdivision (b) from a toll on a high-occupancy toll (HOT) lane.

(d) Sections 23302 and 23302.5 do not apply to a vehicle exempt pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 871, Sec. 2.   (AB 2949)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23301.5.

(a) An authorized emergency vehicle is exempt from any requirement to pay a toll or other charge on a vehicular crossing, toll highway, or high-occupancy toll (HOT) lane, including the requirements of Section 23301, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The authorized emergency vehicle is properly displaying an exempt California license plate, and is properly identified or marked as an authorized emergency vehicle, including, but not limited to, displaying an external surface-mounted red warning light, blue warning light, or both, and displaying either of the following:

(A) Public agency
 identification, including, but not limited to, “Fire Department,” “Sheriff,” or “Police.”

(B) “Ambulance.”

(2) (A) The vehicle is being driven while responding to or returning from an urgent or emergency call, engaged in an urgent or emergency response, or engaging in a fire station coverage assignment directly related to an emergency response.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, an “urgent” response or call means an incident or circumstance that requires an immediate response to a public safety-related incident, but does not warrant the use of emergency warning lights. “Urgent” does not include any personal use, commuting, training, or administrative uses.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), an authorized emergency vehicle, when returning from an urgent or emergency call, or from being engaged in an urgent or emergency response, or from engaging in a fire station coverage assignment directly related to an emergency response, shall not be exempt from any requirement to pay a toll or other charge imposed while traveling on a HOT lane.

(3) The driver of the vehicle determines that the use of the toll facility shall likely improve the availability or response and arrival time of the authorized emergency vehicle and its delivery of essential public safety services.

(b) If the operator of a toll facility elects to send a bill or invoice to the public agency for the use of the toll facility by an authorized emergency
 vehicle, exempt pursuant to subdivision (a), the fire chief, police chief, county sheriff, head of the public agency, ambulance corporation chief executive, or their designee, is authorized to certify in writing that the authorized emergency vehicle was responding to or returning from an emergency call or response and is exempt from the payment of the toll or other charge in accordance with this section. The letter shall be accepted by the toll operator in lieu of payment and is a public document.

(c) An authorized emergency vehicle that does not comply with this section is not exempt from the requirement to pay a toll or other charge on a toll highway, vehicular crossing, or HOT lane. Upon information and belief of the toll operator that an authorized emergency vehicle is not in compliance with this section, the fire chief, police chief,
 county sheriff, head of the public agency,
 ambulance corporation chief executive, or their designee, upon the written request of the owner or operator of the toll facility, shall provide or otherwise make accessible to the toll operator the dispatch records or log books relevant to the time period when the vehicle was in use on the toll highway, vehicular crossing, or HOT lane.

(d) Upon the request of a private or public local emergency service provider, an owner or operator of a toll facility shall enter into an agreement to establish mutually agreed upon terms for the use of the toll facility by the emergency service provider, including, but not limited to, being exempt from toll payment. This section shall not prohibit the owner or operator of a toll facility from having a policy that meets or exceeds this section. If at any time an emergency service provider or
 the owner or operator of a toll facility opts to terminate an agreement regarding the payment and processing of tolls or other charges, this section shall apply to the emergency service provider and the toll facility. An agreement between an emergency service provider and the owner or operator of a toll facility does not exempt other emergency service providers not named in the original agreement and the toll facility from the requirements of this section when those other emergency service providers use a toll facility in the jurisdiction of the owner or operator of the toll facility.

(e) Sections 23302 and 23302.5 do not apply to authorized emergency vehicles exempt pursuant to this section.

(f) As used in this section, “toll facility” includes a toll road, HOT lane, toll bridge,
 toll highway, a vehicular crossing for which payment of a toll or charge is required, or any other toll facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 87, Sec. 1.   (AB 1114)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

23301.8.

Where an issuing agency permits pay-by-plate toll payment as described in subdivision (e) of Section 23302, it shall communicate, as practicable, the pay-by-plate toll amount in the same manner as it communicates other toll payment methods. The issuing agency shall provide publicly available information on how pay-by-plate toll payment works, including the toll amount, process for payment, and period of time a vehicle has to resolve the payment before an issuing agency may process the trip as a violation under Section 40255.
 Communication of this information may include the Department of Transportation’s approved signage, posting of information on the issuing agency’s Internet Web site, media advertising, public meeting or disclosure as required by the issuing agency’s policies, or other methods of communication. Except where the issuing agency has an agreement with a vehicle owner that specifies in advance any administrative fees that will be imposed on the owner for pay-by-plate toll payment, administrative costs shall be incorporated into the pay-by-plate toll amount, and no additional administrative costs shall be added above the posted pay-by-plate toll amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 459, Sec. 1.   (AB 628)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

23302.

(a) (1) It is unlawful for a driver to fail to pay tolls or other charges on any vehicular crossing or toll highway. Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), (c), or (d), it is prima facie evidence of a violation of this section for a person to drive a vehicle onto any vehicular crossing or toll highway without either lawful money of the United States in the driver’s immediate possession in an amount sufficient to pay the prescribed tolls or other charges due from that driver or a transponder or other electronic toll payment device associated with a valid Automatic Vehicle Identification account with a balance sufficient to pay those tolls.

(2) Except as specified in paragraph (3), if a transponder or other electronic toll payment
 device is used to pay tolls or other charges due, the device shall be located in or on the vehicle in a location so as to be visible for the purpose of enforcement at all times when the vehicle is located on the vehicular crossing or toll highway. If required by the operator of a vehicular crossing or toll highway, this requirement applies even if the operator offers free travel or nontoll accounts to certain classes of users.

(3) If a motorcyclist uses a transponder or other electronic toll payment device to lawfully enter a vehicle crossing or toll highway, the motorcyclist shall use any one of the following methods as long as the transponder or device is able to be read by the toll operator’s detection equipment:

(A) Place the transponder or other electronic toll payment device in the motorcyclist’s pocket.

(B) Place the transponder or other electronic toll payment device inside a cycle net that drapes over the gas tank of the motorcycle.

(C) Mount the transponder or other electronic toll payment device on license plate devices provided by the toll operator, if the toll operator provides those devices.

(D) Keep the transponder or other electronic toll payment device in the glove or storage compartment of the motorcycle.

(E) Mount the transponder or other electronic toll payment device on the windshield of the motorcycle.

(b) For vehicular crossings and toll highways that use electronic toll collection as the only method of paying tolls or other charges, it is prima facie evidence of a violation of this section for a driver to drive a vehicle
 onto the vehicular crossing or toll highway without a transponder or other electronic toll payment device associated with a valid Automatic Vehicle Identification account with a balance sufficient to pay those tolls.

(c) For vehicular crossings and toll highways where the issuing agency, as defined in Section 40250, permits pay-by-plate payment of tolls and other charges, in accordance with policies adopted by the issuing agency, it is prima facie evidence of a violation of this section for a driver to drive a vehicle onto the vehicular crossing or toll highway without at least one of the following:

(1) Lawful money of the United States in the driver’s immediate possession in an amount sufficient to pay the prescribed tolls or other charges due from that person.

(2) A transponder or other electronic toll payment
 device associated with a valid Automatic Vehicle Identification account with a balance sufficient to pay those tolls.

(3) Valid vehicle license plates, registered to a vehicle with an up-to-date vehicle registration address pursuant to Section 4159, properly attached pursuant to Section 4850.5 or 5200 to the vehicle in which that driver enters onto the vehicular crossing or toll highway.

(d) For vehicular crossings and toll highways where the issuing agency, as defined in Section 40250, permits pay-by-plate payment of tolls and other charges in accordance with policies adopted by the issuing agency, and where electronic toll collection is the only other method of paying tolls or other charges, it is prima facie evidence of a violation of this section for a driver to drive a vehicle onto the vehicular crossing or toll highway without either a transponder or other electronic toll
 payment device associated with a valid Automatic Vehicle Identification account with a balance sufficient to pay those tolls or valid vehicle license plates, registered to a vehicle with an up-to-date vehicle registration address pursuant to Section 4159, properly attached to the vehicle pursuant to Section 4850.5 or 5200 in which that driver enters onto the vehicular crossing or toll highway.

(e) As used in this article, “pay-by-plate toll payment” means an issuing agency’s use of on-road vehicle license plate identification recognition technology to accept payment of tolls in accordance with policies adopted by the issuing agency.

(f) This section does not require an issuing agency to offer pay-by-plate toll processing as a method for paying tolls.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 969, Sec. 3.   (AB 2594)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23302.5.

(a) No person shall evade or attempt to evade the payment of tolls or other charges on any vehicular crossing or toll highway.

(b) A violation of subdivision (a) is subject to civil penalties and is neither an infraction nor a public offense, as defined in Section 15 of the Penal Code. The enforcement of those civil penalties shall be governed by the civil administrative procedures set forth in Article 4 (commencing with Section 40250) of Chapter 1 of Division
 17.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

23303.

The Department of Transportation shall have a lien and may enforce such lien, as provided in Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 3067) of Title 14 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, for all tolls and charges provided by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

23304.

(a) With respect to a toll bridge, an issuing agency that permits pay-by-plate toll payment as described in subdivision (e) of Section 23302 or that permits payment by a transponder or other electronic toll payment device shall send an invoice by mail for any unpaid toll to the registered vehicle owner. The invoice shall include a notice to the registered owner that, unless the registered owner pays the toll by the due date shown on the invoice, a toll evasion penalty will be assessed. The invoice due date shall not be less than 30 days from the invoice date.

(b) If a toll invoice is not paid by the due date shown on the invoice, the nonpayment shall be deemed an evasion of tolls and the issuing agency, or processing agency as the case may be,
 shall mail a notice of toll evasion violation to the registered owner pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 40254.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 969, Sec. 4.   (AB 2594)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23305.

(a) An issuing agency shall allow a driver of a rental vehicle to register the rental vehicle to a transponder or other electronic toll payment device account with the issuing agency prior to traveling on the issuing agency’s toll facility for the purpose of paying all tolls with a credit or debit card. The issuing agency may require the use of a transponder for this purpose.

(b) The public entities operating or planning to implement a toll facility in this state shall cooperate to publish an internet website at which the public and rental car agencies can view and download, or that provides direct links to, information about how to open an account or acquire a transponder or other electronic toll payment device, for use of each issuing agency’s
 toll facility. The rental car agency shall provide the customer with a written or electronic notice, including the electronic link for the internet website. The notice shall be separate from the rental contract and, if an electronic notice, emailed to the rental customer.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 969, Sec. 5.   (AB 2594)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23306.
